Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1108
Projects; taxation; distress warrant; limitation.

Notwithstanding that title to a project may be in a municipality or county, such projects shall be subject to taxation to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same procedures as privately owned property in similar circumstances, if such projects are leased to or held by private interests; Provided, that where personal property owned by a municipality or county is taxed under this section and such personal property taxes are delinquent, levy by distress warrant for collection of such delinquent taxes may only be made on personal property against which such taxes were levied.

Laws 1961, c. 54, § 8, p. 207;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-1621.

Portion of this section was unconstitutional as granting greater exemption than was authorized by constitutional amendment permitting tax. State ex rel. Meyer v. County of Lancaster, 173 Neb. 195, 113 N.W.2d 63 (1962).